Hawaii statutes.
[§183C-2] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the board of land and
natural resources.

"Chairperson" means the chairperson
of the board of land and natural resources.

"Conservation district" means those
lands within the various counties of the State bounded by the conservation
district line, as established under provisions of Act 187, Session Laws of
Hawaii 1961, and Act 205, Session Laws of Hawaii 1963, or future amendments
thereto.

"Department" means the department of
land and natural resources.

"Kuleana" means those lands granted
to native tenants pursuant to L. 1850, p. 202 entitled "An Act Confirming
Certain Resolutions of the King and Privy Council, Passed on the 21st Day of
December, A.D. 1849, Granting to the Common People Allodial Titles for Their
Own Lands and House Lots, and Certain Other Privileges", as originally
enacted and as amended.

"Land" means all real property, fast
or submerged, and all interests therein, including fauna, flora, minerals, and
all such natural resources, unless otherwise expressly provided.

"Landowner" means an owner of land or
any estate or interest in that land.

"Land use" means:

(1) The placement or erection of any solid material
on land;

(2) The grading, removing, harvesting, dredging,
mining, or extraction of any material or natural resource on land;

(3) The subdivision of land; or

(4) The construction, reconstruction, demolition, or
alteration of any structure, building, or facility on land.

"Nonconforming" use means the lawful
use of any building, premises or land for any trade, industry, residence or
other purposes which is the same as and no greater than that established prior
to October 1, 1964, or prior to the inclusion of the building, premises, or
land within the conservation district. [L 1994, c 270, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next